District of Columbia statutes.
7-2509.03

Expiration and renewal of licenses.

(a)

A license shall expire no later than 2 years after the date of issuance unless revoked by the Chief or renewed pursuant to this subchapter.

(b)

(1)

A license shall be eligible for renewal if:

(A)

The licensee continues to meet the requirements of § 22-4506 and §  7-2509.02, except that:

(i)

With regard to §  7-2509.02(a)(4), only 4 hours of such training shall be required for renewal; and

(ii)

With regard to §  7-2509.02(a)(5), the licensee shall provide proof of 2 hours of range practice within the previous 12 months; and

(B)

The licensee follows any procedures the Chief may establish by rule.

(2)

Timely renewal shall be the responsibility of the licensee, pursuant to any procedures the Chief may establish by rule.

(c)

Any person whose renewal application has been denied may, within 15 days after the date of the notice of denial, appeal to the Concealed Pistol Licensing Review Board established pursuant to §  7-2509.08.

History

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, § 903
as added June 16, 2015, D.C. Law 20-279, § 2(f), 62 DCR 1944